public/strategies/hyphy.txt
hyphy BBBBB1 artel BBBBB2 cions BBBGY3 skunk GBGGB4 swung GGGGG5
                                             GGGGG4
                                BBBYY3 snuff GGGGG4
                                BBGYB3 known GGGGG4
                                BBGYY3 swoon GGGGG4
                                BBYBB3 gumbo BGGGG4 jumbo GGGGG5
                                             BGYYY4 buxom GGGGG5
                                             GGGGG4
                                BBYBY3 bosom GGGGG4
                                BBYGB3 bumfs BYBBB4 wound GGGGG5
                                             BYBYB4 found GGGGG5
                                             BYYBB4 mound GGGGG5
                                             GYBBB4 bound GGGGG5
                                BBYGY3 sound GGGGG4
                                BBYYB3 bongo GGGGG4
                                BBYYG3 bonus GGGGG4
                                BGBBB3 vivid GGGGG4
                                BGBYB3 minim GGGGG4
                                BGBYG3 minus GGGGG4
                                BGGBY3 kiosk GGGGG4
                                BGYBB3 widow GGGGG4
                                BGYYB3 bingo BGGGG4 dingo GGGGG5
                                             GGGGG4
                                BGYYY3 bison GGGGG4
                                BYBBY3 skiff GBYBB4 squib GGGGG5
                                             GGGGG4
                                BYBGY3 suing GBGGG4 swing GGGGG5
                                             GGGGG4
                                             YYGGG4 using GGGGG5
                                BYBYB3 fungi BYYBY4 undid GGGGG5
                                             GGGGG4
                                BYBYY3 sniff GGGGG4
                                BYGBB3 ovoid GGGGG4
                                BYYBB3 idiom GGGGG4
                                BYYGB3 doing BGGGG4 going GGGGG5
                                             BYGGG4 owing GGGGG5
                                             GGGGG4
                                BYYYB3 onion BGGGG4 union GGGGG5
                                             BGYGB4 inbox GGGGG5
                                             GGGGG4
                                GBYYB3 condo GGGGG4
                                GGBBB3 civic GGGGG4
                                GYBBB3 cubic GGGGG4
                                GYBYB3 cumin GGGGG4
                                GYYBB3 comic GGGGG4
                                GYYYB3 conic GGGGG4
                                YBBBG3 mucus GGGGG4
                                YBBYY3 snuck GGGGG4
                                YBGBY3 scoff GGGGG4
                                             GYGBB4 smock GGGGG5
                                YBGYB3 knock GGGGG4
                                YBYBG3 focus GGGGG4
                                YGBBB3 mimic GGGGG4
                                YGBBG3 ficus GGGGG4
                                YGYBY3 disco GGGGG4
                                YYBBB3 quick GGGGG4
                                YYBBY3 music GGGGG4
                                YYBGB3 icing GGGGG4
                                YYYYB3 ionic GGGGG4
                                YYYYY3 scion GGGGG4
                                             GYYYY4 sonic GGGGG5
                   BBBBG2 swill BBBBG3 mogul GGGGG4
                                BBBGG3 knoll GGGGG4
                                BBGGG3 quill GGGGG4
                                BBYBG3 civil BGYGG4 vigil GGGGG5
                                             GGGGG4
                                GBBGG3 skull GGGGG4
                                GBGGG3 skill GGGGG4
                                GGGGG3
                                GYBBG3 scowl GGGGG4
                   BBBBY2 confs BBBBB3 build BBYYG4 livid GGGGG5
                                             BGGGG4 guild GGGGG5
                                             GGGGG4
                                BBBBG3 bliss GGGGG4
                                BBBBY3 skulk GGGGG4
                                BBBGB3 bluff BGGGG4 fluff GGGGG5
                                             GGGGG4
                                BBBYB3 fluid GGGGG4
                                BBYBB3 blind GGGGB4 blink GGGGG5
                                             GGGGG4
                                BBYBY3 sling GGBGB4 slunk GGGGG5
                                             GGBGG4 slung GGGGG5
                                             GGGGB4 slink GGGGG5
                                             GGGGG4
                                BBYYB3 fling GGBGB4 flunk GGGGG5
                                             GGBGG4 flung GGGGG5
                                             GGGGG4
                                BGBBB3 would GGGGG4
                                BGBBY3 solid GGGGG4
                                BGBYB3 folio GGGGG4
                                BGYBB3 login GGGGG4
                                BYBBB3 blood BGGGB4 gloom GGGGG5
                                             BYYGB4 igloo GGGGG5
                                             GGGGB4 bloom GGGGG5
                                             GGGGG4
                                             YYYBB4 limbo GGGGG5
                                BYBBG3 gloss GGGGG4
                                BYBYB3 flood GGGGG4
                                BYBYG3 floss GGGGG4
                                BYGBB3 lingo GGGGG4
                                BYYBB3 blond GGGGG4
                                             GGGYB4 blown GGGGG5
                                BYYYB3 flown GGGGG4
                                GBBBB3 click GGBGG4 cluck GGGGG5
                                             GGGBB4 climb GGGGG5
                                             GGGGG4
                                GBBGB3 cliff GGGGG4
                                GBYBB3 cling GGBGG4 clung GGGGG5
                                             GGGGB4 clink GGGGG5
                                             GGGGG4
                                GGBBB3 could GGGGG4
                                GGYBB3 colon GGGGG4
                                GYBBB3 clock GGGBB4 cloud GGGGG5
                                             GGGGG4
                                GYYBB3 clown GGGGG4
                                YBBBB3 lucid GGGGG4
                                YBBBY3 slick GGGGG4
                                YBBYB3 flick GGGGG4
                                YGBBB3 logic GGGGG4
                                YGBBG3 locus GGGGG4
                                YYBBB3 block GGGGG4
                                YYBBY3 scold GGGGG4
                                YYBYB3 flock GGGGG4
                   BBBGB2 vodun BBBBB3 emcee GGGGG4
                                BBBBG3 semen GGGGG4
                                BBBBY3 sinew GGGGG4
                                BBBYG3 queen GGGGG4
                                BBGBG3 widen GGGGG4
                                BBGBY3 index GGGGG4
                                BBYBB3 embed GGGGG4
                                BBYBY3 kneed GGGGG4
                                BBYYB3 bused GGGGG4
                                BBYYY3 unfed GGBGG4 unwed GGGGG5
                                             GGGGG4
                                BGBBG3 woken GGBGG4 women GGGGG5
                                             GGGGG4
                                BGGBB3 modem GGGGG4
                                BGYBG3 dozen GGGGG4
                                GBBBG3 vixen GGGGG4
                                GYGBB3 video GGGGG4
                                YBBBG3 given BBGGG4 seven GGGGG5
                                             GGGGG4
                                YGBBG3 coven BGGGG4 woven GGGGG5
                                             GGGGG4
                   BBBGG2 bevel BBBGG3 dowel GGGGG4
                                             YGBGG4 model GGGGG5
                                BBGGG3 novel GGGGG4
                                BBYGG3 vowel GGGGG4
                                BGBGG3 jewel GGGGG4
                                BGGGG3 level GGGGG4
                                BYBGG3 excel GGGGG4
                                             YBBGG4 kneel GGGGG5
                                GBBGG3 bowel GGGGG4
                                GGBGG3 bezel GGGGG4
                                GGGGG3
                                YBBGG3 libel GGGGG4
                   BBBGY2 bonus BBBBB3 melee GGGGG4
                                BBBBY3 sleek GGGGG4
                                BBBYB3 clued GGGGG4
                                BBGBB3 linen GGGGG4
                                BBYBB3 liken GGGGG4
                                BBYYB3 lumen GGGGG4
                                BGBBB3 golem GGGGG4
                                BYYBB3 olden GGGGG4
                                GBBBB3 bleed GGGGG4
                   BBBYB2 suing BBBBB3 booze BBBBG4 femme GGGGG5
                                             BBGBG4 evoke GGGGG5
                                             GGGGG4
                                BBBBY3 dodge BBGGG4 wedge GGGGG5
                                             BYBYY4 gecko GGGGG5
                                             GGGGG4
                                BBBGB3 ozone GGGGG4
                                BBBYB3 demon BGBBY4 fence GGGGG5
                                             BGYGY4 venom GGGGG5
                                             GGGGG4
                                             YYBGY4 endow GGGGG5
                                BBBYY3 gnome GGGGG4
                                BBGBB3 oxide GGGGG4
                                             YBGBG4 voice GGGGG5
                                BBGGB3 ovine GGGGG4
                                BBGGG3 being BYGGG4 eking GGGGG5
                                             GGGGG4
                                BBGYB3 knife GGGGG4
                                BBGYY3 deign BGGGG4 feign GGGGG5
                                             GGGGG4
                                BBYBB3 biome BGGBG4 diode GGGGG5
                                             BYBYY4 medic GGGGG5
                                             BYYYG4 movie GGGGG5
                                             GGGGG4
                                BBYBY3 midge GGGGG4
                                BBYGB3 fiend GGGGG4
                                BBYYB3 denim BYGYB4 wince GGGGG5
                                             BYGYY4 mince GGGGG5
                                             BYYYB4 niece GGGGG5
                                             GGGGG4
                                BBYYY3 begin BGYGY4 genie GGGGG5
                                             GGGGG4
                                             GYYYY4 binge GGGGG5
                                BGBBB3 queue GGGGG4
                                BGBBY3 judge BGBYG4 fugue GGGGG5
                                             BGGGG4 budge BGGGG5 fudge GGGGG6
                                                          GGGGG5
                                             GGGGG4
                                BGBYB3 dunce BGGGG4 ounce GGGGG5
                                             GGGGG4
                                BGBYY3 nudge GGGGG4
                                BGGBB3 juice GGGGG4
                                BGGBY3 guide GGGGG4
                                BYBBB3 deuce GGGGG4
                                BYBBG3 debug GGGGG4
                                BYBBY3 gouge GGGGG4
                                             YGYBG4 vogue GGGGG5
                                BYBYB3 undue BYBGG4 venue GGGGG5
                                             GGGGG4
